Illinois, session 104th, HB622.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Comprehensive Lead Education, Reduction, 5and Window Replacement Program Act is amended by changing 6Section 1 as follows: 7    (410 ILCS 43/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Comprehensive Lead Education, Reduction, and Window 10Replacement Program Act.11(Source: P.A. 95-492, eff. 1-1-08.)